Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 3. Drugs and Devices.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Drugs, Narcotics, and Poisons, §§ 96, 232.

28 C.J.S., Drugs and Narcotics, § 117 et seq.

Hospital’s liability for negligence in connection with preparation, storage, or dispensing of drug or medicine. 9 ALR3d 579.

Liability of manufacturer or seller for injury or death allegedly caused by use of contraceptive. 70 ALR3d 315.

Administering or prescribing drugs for weight control. 1 ALR4th 236.

Administering or prescribing birth control pills or devices. 9 ALR4th 372.

Liability of manufacturer or seller for injury or death allegedly caused by use of contraceptive. 54 ALR5th 1.

Validity of inspection conducted under provisions of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USCS § 374(a)) authorizing FDA inspectors to enter and inspect food, drug or cosmetic factory, warehouse, or other establishment. 18 ALR Fed. 734.

What is “drug” within meaning of § 201(g)(1) of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USCS § 321(g)(1). 127 ALR Fed. 141.

What is “device” within meaning of § 201(h) of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USCS § 321(h)). 129 ALR Fed. 343.

What is “new drug” within meaning of § 201(p) of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USCS § 321(p)). 133 ALR Fed. 229.

Sec. 17.20.080.
Adulterated drugs and devices.

A drug or device is adulterated if

it consists in whole or in part of a filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance;

it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions in which it may have been contaminated with filth, or in which it may have been rendered injurious to health;

it is a drug and its container is composed, in whole or in part, of poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health; or

it is a drug and it bears or contains, for purposes of coloring only, a coal tar other than one from a batch certified under the authority of the federal act.

A drug is adulterated if it purports to be or is represented as a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, and its strength differs from, or its quality or purity falls below, the standard set forth in the compendium. The determination as to strength, quality, or purity shall be made in accordance with the tests or methods of assay set forth in the compendium, or in the absence or inadequacy of tests or methods of assay, those prescribed under authority of the federal act. A drug defined in an official compendium is not adulterated under this subsection because it differs from the standard of strength, quality, or purity set forth in the compendium, if its difference in strength, quality, or purity is plainly stated on its label. When a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States it is subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it is subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia.

A drug is adulterated if it is not subject to the provisions of (b) of this section and its strength differs from, or its purity or quality falls below, that which it purports or is represented to possess.

A drug is adulterated if a substance has been

mixed or packed with it to reduce its quality or strength; or

substituted wholly or in part for it.

History.

(§ 14 ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.085.
Opioid overdose drugs.

Notwithstanding a provision or rule of law to the contrary, a health care provider authorized to prescribe an opioid overdose drug may prescribe an opioid overdose drug directly or by standing order or protocol to a person at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose or to a family member, friend, caregiver, or other person in a position to administer an opioid overdose drug to a person at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose.

An employee or volunteer of an opioid overdose program, if acting under a standing order or protocol under (a) of this section, notwithstanding a provision or rule of law to the contrary, may receive a supply of opioid overdose drugs, possess opioid overdose drugs, and provide an opioid overdose drug to a person at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose or to a family member, friend, caregiver, or other person in a position to administer an opioid overdose drug to a person at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose.

The chief medical officer of the department may issue a standing order, including a statewide standing order, for the prescription of an opioid overdose drug.

Annually, on or before October 1, the department shall complete a report describing activities and expenditures related to Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration grants and opioid overdose drug distribution and shall submit the report to the senate secretary and chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available.

In this section,

“health care provider” means a licensed physician, osteopath, dentist, advanced nurse practitioner, physician assistant, nurse, village health aide, or pharmacist operating within the scope of the health care provider’s authority;

“opioid” includes the opium and opiate substances and opium and opiate derivatives listed in AS

11.71.140

;

“opioid overdose drug” means a drug that reverses, in whole or in part, the pharmacological effects of an opioid overdose;

“opioid overdose program” means a program that provides opioid overdose drugs to persons at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose or to a family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose.

History.

(§ 6 ch 2 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 2017; am §§ 1, 2 ch 14 SLA 2021)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (c) and (d) were enacted as (d) and (e); relettered in 2017, at which time former subsection (c) was relettered as (e).

Section 2, ch. 1, SLA 2017, would have repealed subsection (c) effective June 30, 2021; however, sec. 2, ch. 1, SLA 2017, was subsequently repealed by sec. 3, ch. 14, SLA 2021, effective June 30, 2021, which had the effect of continuing subsection (c).

Cross references. —

For a provision relating to immunity from civil liability for prescribing, providing, or administering an opioid overdose drug, see AS

09.65.340

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective March 15, 2017, added (d) and (e) [now (c) and (d)].

The 2021 amendment, effective June 30, 2021, in (c), deleted the second sentence, which read, “A standing order issued under this subsection must expire on or before June 30, 2021.”; in (d), substituted “opioid overdose drug distribution” for “the opioid epidemic” following “Mental Health Services Administration grants and.”

Effective dates. —

Section 6, ch. 2, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on March 15, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 3,
ch. 1, SLA 2017, subsections (c) and (d) are retroactive to March 15, 2017.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 1, SLA 2017 (SB 91), which amended this section, see 2017 Senate Journal 478 - 479.

Sec. 17.20.090.
Misbranded drugs and devices.

A drug or device is misbranded

if its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

if it is in package form unless it bears a label containing (A) the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and (B) an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; however, under (B) of this paragraph reasonable variations shall be permitted and exemptions for small packages shall be established by regulations adopted by the department;

if a word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed with conspicuousness as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling and in terms which render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of the purchase and use;

if it is for use by man and contains a quantity of the narcotic or hypnotic substance alpha-eucaine, barbituric acid, beta-eucaine, bromal, cannabis, carbromal, chloral, coca, cocaine, codeine, heroin, marijuana, morphine, opium, paraldehyde, peyote, or sulphonmethane, or a chemical derivative of any of them, which has been by the commissioner after investigation found to be and by regulations under this chapter designated as habit forming; unless its label bears the name, and quantity or proportion of the substance or derivative and in juxtaposition with it the statement “Warning — May be habit forming”;

if it is a drug and is not designated solely by a name recognized in an official compendium unless its label bears (A) the common or usual name of the drug; and (B) in case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each active ingredient, including the kind and quantity or proportion of alcohol, and including, whether active or not, the name and quantity or proportion of bromides, ether, chloroform, acetanilid, acetphenetidin, amidopyrine, antipyrine, atropine, hyoscine, hyoscyamine, arsenic, digitalis glucosines, mercury, quabain, strophanthin, strychnine, thyroid, or derivative or preparation of any of these substances contained in them; however, to the extent that compliance with the requirements of (B) of this paragraph is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by regulations adopted by the department;

unless its labeling bears (A) adequate directions for use; and (B) adequate warnings against use in those pathological conditions or by children where its use may be dangerous to health, or against unsafe dosage or methods or duration of administration or application, in the manner and form necessary for the protection of users; however, where a requirement of (A) of this paragraph as applied to a drug or device is not necessary for the protection of the public health, the department shall adopt regulations exempting the drug or device from these requirements;

if it purports to be a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, unless it is packaged and labeled as prescribed in the compendium; however, the method of packing may be modified with the consent of the commissioner, and when a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, it is subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia with respect to packaging and labeling unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia;

if it has been found by the commissioner to be a drug liable to deterioration, unless it is packaged in the form and manner and its label bears a statement of the precautions the department by regulation requires as necessary for the protection of public health; and no regulation shall be established for a drug recognized in an official compendium until the commissioner has informed the appropriate body charged with the revision of the compendium of the need for packaging or labeling requirements and that body has failed within a reasonable time to prescribe the requirements;

if it is a drug and its container is made, formed, or filled so as to be misleading or if it is an imitation of another drug; or if it is offered for sale under the name of another drug;

if it is dangerous to health when used in the dosage, or with the frequency or duration prescribed, recommended, or suggested in its labeling;

if (A) it is a drug sold at retail and contains any quantity of aminopyrine, barbituric acid, cinchophen, pituitary, thyroid, or their derivatives, or (B) it is a drug or device sold at retail and its label as originally packed bears a statement that it is to be dispensed or sold only by or on the prescription of a physician, dentist, or veterinarian, unless it is sold on a written prescription signed by a member of the medical, dental, or veterinary profession licensed by law to administer the drug or device, and its label as dispensed bears the name and place of business of the seller, the serial number and date of the prescription, and the name of the member of the medical, dental, or veterinary profession, and the prescription shall not be refilled except on the written authorization of the prescribing physician, dentist, or veterinarian.

History.

(§ 15 ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.100.
Exemptions in case of drugs and devices.

A drug sold on a written prescription signed by a member of the medical, dental, or veterinary profession, except a drug sold in the course of the conduct of a business of selling drugs pursuant to diagnosis by mail, is exempt from the requirements of AS

17.20.090

(2) and (5) if (1) the member of the medical, dental, or veterinary profession is licensed by law to administer the drug, and (2) the drug bears a label containing the name and place of business of the seller, the serial number and date of the prescription, and the name of the member of the medical, dental, or veterinary profession.

History.

(§ 16 ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.105.
Preparation of drug prescription by pharmacist.

In preparing a drug prescription a pharmacist shall indicate on the drug container the name and strength of the drug contained in it, unless specifically directed otherwise by the prescribing physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, or veterinarian. If a drug is a mixture of pharmacologically active substances, only the name of the mixture need be indicated on the container, or in the absence of a name, the term “physician’s mixture” may be used.

In preparing a prescription, a pharmacist may not substitute a drug for a registered brand or trade name product specified unless the pharmacist obtains permission from the author of the prescription; but if the prescribing physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, or veterinarian is temporarily unavailable, the pharmacist may, if unable to supply the drug requested, substitute a drug or preparation of approximately equal therapeutic value so long as the pharmacist notifies the author of the prescription at an early opportunity.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 1971)

Sec. 17.20.110.
Sale of new drugs.

A person may not sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold for sale, or give away a new drug unless

an application for it has become effective under the federal act; or

when not subject to the federal act unless the drug has been tested and has not been found to be unsafe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling of it, and before selling or offering it for sale there has been filed with the commissioner an application setting out

full reports of investigations which have been made to show whether or not the drug is safe for use;

a full list of the articles used as components of the drug;

a full statement of the composition of the drug;

a full description of the methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture, processing, and packing of the drug;

samples of the drug and articles used as components of it which the commissioner requires; and

specimens of the labeling proposed to be used for the drug.

This section does not apply to a physician who prescribes or administers a new drug in accordance with the conditions set out in AS

08.64.367(c)

.

History.

(§ 17(a) ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 3 ch 53 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, added (b).

Collateral references. —

Right of medical patient to obtain, or physician to prescribe, Laetrile for treatment of illness — state cases. 5 ALR4th 219.

Sec. 17.20.120.
Application for sale of new drugs.

The application provided for in AS

17.20.110

is effective on the 60th day after the filing of it.
If the commissioner finds, after notice to the applicant and providing an opportunity for a hearing, that the drug is not safe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the proposed labeling, the commissioner shall, before the effective date of the application, issue an order refusing to permit the application to become effective.
An order refusing an application to become effective may be revoked by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 17(b), (d) ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.130.
Exemptions.

AS

17.20.110

does not apply to a drug

intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety in drugs if the drug is plainly labeled “for investigational use only”; or

regulated under 42 U.S.C. 262.

History.

(§ 17(c) ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 72 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 17.20.132.
Enforcement authority.

The commissioner is responsible for enforcing AS

17.20.080

—

17.20.135

, and may delegate that authority as appropriate. This section does not limit the authority of peace officers.

History.

(E.O. No. 51, § 19 (1981))

Sec. 17.20.135.
Definitions.

In AS

17.20.080

—

17.20.135

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services.

History.

(E.O. No. 51, § 19 (1981))